Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 3. Management of Condominium.

§ 55.1-1940.
Bylaws to be recorded with declaration; contents; unit owners’ association; executive board; amendment of bylaws.

Bylaws providing for governance of the condominium by an association of all of the unit owners shall be recorded simultaneously with the declaration. The unit owners’ association may be incorporated.

The bylaws shall provide whether or not the unit owners’ association shall elect an executive board. If there is to be such a board, the bylaws shall specify the powers and responsibilities of the board and the number and terms of its members. Except to the extent the condominium instruments provide otherwise, any vacancy occurring in the executive board shall be filled by a vote of a majority of the remaining members of the executive board at a meeting of the executive board, even though the members of the executive board present at such meeting may constitute less than a quorum because a quorum is impossible to obtain. Each person so elected shall serve until the next annual meeting of the unit owners’ association at which time a successor shall be elected by a vote of the unit owners. The bylaws may delegate to such board, inter alia, any of the powers and responsibilities assigned by this chapter to the unit owners’ association. The bylaws shall also specify which, if any, of its powers and responsibilities the unit owners’ association or its executive board may delegate to a managing agent.

The bylaws may provide for arbitration of disputes or other means of alternative dispute resolution in accordance with subsection C of §

55.1-1915

.

In any case where an amendment to the declaration is required by subsection B, C, or D of §

55.1-1918

, the person required to execute such amendment shall also prepare and execute, and record simultaneously with such amendment, an amendment to the bylaws. The amendment to the bylaws shall allocate votes in the unit owners’ association to new units on the same basis as was used for the allocation of such votes to the units depicted on plats and plans recorded pursuant to subsections A and B of §

55.1-1920

or shall abolish the votes appertaining to former units, as appropriate. The amendment to the bylaws shall also reallocate rights to future common surpluses, and liabilities for future common expenses not specially assessed, in proportion to relative voting strengths as reflected by the amendment.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.73; 1978, c. 332; 1993, c. 667; 1998, c. 32; 2012, c. 758; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 592.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 592 substituted “surpluses” for “profits” in subsection D in the last sentence.

§ 55.1-1941.
Amendment to condominium instruments; consent of mortgagee.

If any provision in the condominium instruments requires the written consent of a mortgagee in order to amend the condominium instruments, the unit owners’ association shall be deemed to have received the written consent of a mortgagee if the unit owners’ association sends the text of the proposed amendment by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the mortgagee at the address supplied by such mortgagee in a written request to the unit owners’ association to receive notice of proposed amendments to the condominium instruments and receives no written objection to the adoption of the amendment from the mortgagee within 60 days of the date that the notice of amendment is sent by the unit owners’ association, unless the condominium instruments expressly provide otherwise. If the mortgagee has not supplied an address to the unit owners’ association, the unit owners’ association shall be deemed to have received the written consent of a mortgagee if the unit owners’ association sends the text of the proposed amendment by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the mortgagee at the address filed in the land records or with the local tax assessor’s office and receives no written objection to the adoption of the amendment from the mortgagee within 60 days of the date that the notice of amendment is sent by the unit owners’ association, unless the condominium instruments expressly provide otherwise.

Any amendment adopted without the required consent of a mortgagee shall be voidable only by an institutional lender that was entitled to notice and an opportunity to consent. An action to void an amendment shall be subject to the one-year statute of limitations set forth in subsection C of §

55.1-1934

beginning on the date of recordation of the amendment.

Subsection A shall not apply to amendments that alter the priority of the lien of the mortgagee or that materially impair or affect the unit as collateral or the right of the mortgagee to foreclose on a unit as collateral.

Where the condominium instruments are silent on the need for mortgagee consent, no mortgagee consent shall be required if the amendment to the condominium instruments does not specifically affect mortgagee rights.

History.

1993, c. 1, § 55-79.73:1; 1998, c. 32; 2007, c. 675; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 817.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 817 inserted subsection B, and redesignated former subsections B and C as subsections C and D.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The cases cited below were decided under prior law.

Purported assignment affected mortgagee’s rights. —

Uncertainty as to the proper ownership of a parking space that was purportedly transferred by a prior condominium owner to a different unit owner prior to foreclosure on the prior owner’s unit specifically affected the mortgagee’s rights. Nicksolat v. Gharavi, 87 Va. Cir. 106, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 89 (Fairfax County Sept. 16, 2013).

Interpretation. —

In determining proper ownership of a parking space in a condominium development that was purportedly assigned by a prior owner to a different unit owner, the various controlling statutory provisions were to be read together because, based on the statutory language, the general requirement that mortgagee consent was required was not supplanted by a specific rule. Nicksolat v. Gharavi, 87 Va. Cir. 106, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 89 (Fairfax County Sept. 16, 2013).

Assignment of parking space a nullity. —

In determining proper ownership of a parking space in a condominium development, when the prior unit owner failed to obtained the consent of the trustees on the deed of trust before reassigning the parking space to a different unit owner, he violated the statutory provision that required their prior consent, such that he lost his statutory right to assign the parking space, and his subsequent purported assignment thereof was a nullity. Nicksolat v. Gharavi, 87 Va. Cir. 106, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 89 (Fairfax County Sept. 16, 2013).

§ 55.1-1942.
Reformation of declaration; judicial procedure.

A unit owners’ association may petition the circuit court in the county or city in which the condominium or the greater part of the condominium is located to reform the condominium instruments where the unit owners’ association, acting through its executive board, has attempted to amend the condominium instruments regarding ownership of legal title of the common elements or real property using provisions outlined in the condominium instruments to resolve (i) ambiguities or inconsistencies in the condominium instruments that are the source of legal and other disputes pertaining to the legal rights and responsibilities of the unit owners’ association or individual unit owners or (ii) scrivener’s errors, including incorrectly identifying the unit owners’ association, incorrectly identifying an entity other than the unit owners’ association, or errors arising from oversight or from an inadvertent omission or mathematical mistake.

The court shall have jurisdiction over matters set forth in subsection A regarding ownership of legal title of the common elements or real property to:

Reform, in whole or in part, any provision of the condominium instruments; and

Correct mistakes or any other error in the condominium instruments that may exist with respect to the declaration for any other purpose.

A petition filed by the unit owners’ association with the court setting forth any inconsistency or error made in the condominium instruments, or the necessity for any change in such instruments, shall be deemed sufficient basis for the reformation, in whole or in part, of the condominium instruments, provided that:

The unit owners’ association has made three good faith attempts to convene a duly called meeting of the unit owners’ association to present for consideration amendments to the condominium instruments for the reasons specified in subsection A, which attempts have proven unsuccessful as evidenced by an affidavit verified by oath of the principal officer of the unit owners’ association;

There is no adequate remedy at law as practical and effective to attain the ends of justice as may be accomplished in the circuit court;

Where the declarant of the condominium still owns a unit or continues to have any special declarant rights in the condominium, the declarant joins in the petition of the unit owners’ association;

A copy of the petition is sent to all unit owners at least 30 days before the petition is filed as evidenced by an affidavit verified by oath of the principal officer of the unit owners’ association; and

A copy of the petition is sent to all mortgagees at least 30 days before the petition is filed as evidenced by an affidavit verified by oath of the principal officer of the unit owners’ association.

Any mortgagee of a condominium unit in the condominium shall have standing to participate in the reformation proceedings before the court. No reformation pursuant to this section shall affect mortgagee rights, alter the priority of the lien of any mortgage, materially impair or affect any condominium unit as collateral for a mortgage, or affect a mortgagee’s right to foreclose on a condominium unit as collateral without the prior written consent of the mortgagee. Consent of a mortgagee required by this section may be deemed received pursuant to §

55.1-1941

.

History.

2014, c. 659, § 55-79.73:2; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1943.
Control of condominium by declarant.

The condominium instruments may authorize the declarant, or a managing agent or some other person selected or to be selected by the declarant, to appoint and remove some or all of the officers of the unit owners’ association or its executive board, or to exercise powers and responsibilities otherwise assigned by the condominium instruments and by this chapter to the unit owners’ association, the officers, or the executive board. The declarant, managing agent, or other person selected by the declarant to so appoint and remove officers or the executive board or to exercise such powers and responsibilities otherwise assigned to the unit owners’ association, the officers, or the executive board shall be subject to liability as fiduciaries of the unit owners for their action or omissions during the period of declarant control as specified in the condominium instruments or, if not so specified, within such period as defined in this section. But no amendment to the condominium instruments shall increase the scope of such authorization if there is any unit owner other than the declarant, and no such authorization shall be valid after the time limit set by the condominium instruments or after units to which three-fourths of the undivided interests in the common elements appertain have been conveyed, whichever occurs first. For the purposes of the preceding sentence only, the calculation of the fraction of undivided interest shall be based upon the total undivided interests assigned or to be assigned to all units registered with the Common Interest Community Board pursuant to subsection B of §

55.1-1978

and described pursuant to subdivision A 4, B 2, or C 8 of §

55.1-1916

.

The time limit initially set by the condominium instruments shall not exceed five years in the case of an expandable condominium; three years in the case of a condominium other than an expandable condominium, containing any convertible land; or two years in the case of any other condominium. Such time period shall begin upon settlement of the first unit to be sold in any portion of the condominium.Notwithstanding the foregoing, at the request of the declarant, such time limits may be extended for a period not to exceed 15 years from the settlement of the first unit to be sold in any portion of the condominium or after units to which three-fourths of the undivided interests in the common elements appertain have been conveyed, whichever occurs first, provided that (i) a special meeting is held prior to the expiration of the initial period of declarant control; (ii) at such special meeting, the extension of such time limits is approved by a two-thirds affirmative vote of the unit owners other than the declarant; and (iii) at such special meeting, there is an election of a warranty review committee consisting of no fewer than three persons unaffiliated with the declarant.Prior to any such vote, the declarant shall furnish to the unit owners in the notice of such special meeting made in accordance with §

55.1-1949

a written statement in a form provided by the Common Interest Community Board that discloses that an affirmative vote extends the right of the declarant, or a managing agent or some other person selected by the declarant, to (a) appoint and remove some or all of the officers of the unit owners’ association or its executive board and (b) exercise powers and responsibilities otherwise assigned by the condominium instruments and by this chapter. In addition, such statement shall contain both a notice of the effect of the extension of declarant control on the enforcement of the warranty against structural defects provided by the declarant in accordance with §

55.1-1955

and a statement that a unit owner is advised to exercise whatever due diligence the unit owner deems necessary to protect his interest.

If entered into any time prior to the expiration of the period of declarant control, no contract or lease entered into with the declarant or any entity controlled by the declarant, management contract, employment contract, or lease of recreational or parking areas or facilities, which is directly or indirectly made by or on behalf of the unit owners’ association, its executive board, or the unit owners as a group, shall be entered into for a period in excess of two years. Any such contract or agreement entered into on or after July 1, 1978, may be terminated without penalty by the unit owners’ association or its executive board upon not less than 90 days’ written notice to the other party given not later than 60 days after the expiration of the period of declarant control. Any such contract or agreement may be renewed for periods not in excess of two years; however, at the end of any two-year period the unit owners’ association or its executive board may terminate any further renewals or extensions of such contract or agreement. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any lease referred to in §

55.1-1910

or subject to subsection E of §

55.1-1916

.

If entered into at any time prior to the expiration of the period of declarant control, any contract, lease, or agreement, other than those subject to the provisions of subsection C, may be entered into by or on behalf of the unit owners’ association, its executive board, or the unit owners as a group, if such contract, lease, or agreement is bona fide and is commercially reasonable to the unit owners’ association at the time entered into under the circumstances.

This section does not apply to any contract, incidental to the disposition of a condominium unit, to provide to a unit owner for the duration of such unit owner’s life, or for any term in excess of one year, nursing services, medical services, other health-related services, board and lodging and care as necessary, or any combination of such services. The rule of property law known as the rule restricting unreasonable restraints on alienation shall not be applied to defeat any provision of the condominium instruments requiring that the unit owners be parties to such contracts.

If the unit owners’ association is not in existence or does not have officers at the time of the creation of the condominium, the declarant shall, until there is such an association with such officers, have the power and the responsibility to act in all instances where this chapter requires action by the unit owners’ association, its executive board, or any officer.

Thirty days prior to the expiration of the period of declarant control, the declarant shall notify the governing body of the locality in which the condominium is located of the forthcoming termination of declarant control. Prior to the expiration of the 30-day period, the local governing body or an agency designated by the local governing body shall advise the principal elected officer of the condominium unit owners’ association of any outstanding violations of applicable building codes or local ordinances or other deficiencies of record.

Within 45 days from the expiration of the period of declarant control, the declarant shall deliver to the president of the unit owners’ association or his designated agent (i) all unit owners’ association books and records held by or controlled by the declarant, including minute books and all rules, regulations, and amendments to such rules and regulations that may have been promulgated; (ii) an accurate and complete statement of receipts and expenditures prepared using the accrual method of accounting from the date of the recording of the condominium instruments to the end of the regular accounting period immediately succeeding the first annual meeting of the unit owners, not to exceed 60 days from the date of the election; (iii) a copy of the latest available approved plans and specifications for all improvements in the project or as-built plans, if available; (iv) all association insurance policies that are currently in force; (v) written unexpired warranties of the contractors, subcontractors, suppliers, and manufacturers, if any; (vi) contracts in which the association is a contracting party, if any; (vii) a list of manufacturers of paints, roofing materials, and other similar materials if specified for use on the condominium property; and (viii) an inventory and description of stormwater facilities located on the common elements or which otherwise serve the condominium and for which the unit owners’ association has, or subsequently may have, maintenance, repair, or replacement responsibility, together with the requirements for maintenance thereof.The requirement for delivery of stormwater facility information required by clause (viii) shall be deemed satisfied by delivery to the association of a final site plan or final construction drawing showing stormwater facilities as approved by a local government jurisdiction and applicable recorded easements, or agreements if any, containing requirements for the maintenance, repair, or replacement of the stormwater facilities.If the unit owners’ association is managed by a management company in which the declarant, or its principals, have no pecuniary interest or management role, then such management company shall have the responsibility to provide the documents and information required by clauses (i), (ii), (iv), and (vi).

This section shall be strictly construed to protect the rights of the unit owners.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.74; 1975, c. 415; 1978, c. 332; 1980, c. 738; 1984, c. 601; 1985, c. 83; 1996, c. 977; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2013, c. 599; 2019, cc. 712, 724.

Cross references.

As to civil immunity for officers, partners, members, managers, trustees and directors of certain tax exempt organizations, see §

8.01-220.1:1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 599, cl. 2 provides: “That for any condominium existing on July 1, 2013, the condominium instruments for such condominium may be amended in the manner prescribed in the relevant condominium instruments or by statute to conform to the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2019, c. 724 amended § 55-79.74 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in this section by adding, in subsection H, by adding clause (viii) to the first paragraph, inserting the second paragraph and making related changes.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article, “Special Problems Related to Condominium Construction Litigation,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 405 (1985).

§ 55.1-1944.
Deposit of funds.

All funds deposited with a managing agent shall be handled in a fiduciary capacity and shall be kept in a fiduciary trust account in a federally insured financial institution separate from other assets of the managing agent. The funds shall be the property of the unit owners’ association and shall be segregated for each account in the records of the managing agent in a manner that permits the funds to be identified on an individual unit owners’ association basis.

History.

2007, cc. 696, 712, § 55-79.74:01; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1945.
Books, minutes, and records; inspection.

The declarant, managing agent, unit owners’ association, or person specified in the bylaws of the association shall keep detailed records of the receipts and expenditures affecting the operation and administration of the condominium and specifying the maintenance and repair expenses of the common elements and any other expenses incurred by or on behalf of the association. Subject to the provisions of subsections B, C, and E, upon request, any unit owner shall be provided a copy of such records and minutes. All financial books and records shall be kept in accordance with generally accepted accounting practices.

Subject to the provisions of subsection C, all books and records kept by or on behalf of the unit owners’ association, including the unit owners’ association membership list, and addresses and aggregate salary information of unit owners’ association employees, shall be available for examination and copying by a unit owner in good standing or his authorized agent so long as the request is for a proper purpose related to his membership in the unit owners’ association and not for pecuniary gain or commercial solicitation. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, this right of examination shall exist without reference to the duration of membership and may be exercised (i) only during reasonable business hours or at a mutually convenient time and location and (ii) upon five business days’ written notice for a unit owner association managed by a common interest community manager and 10 business days’ written notice for a self-managed unit owners’ association, which notice shall reasonably identify the purpose for the request and the specific books and records of the unit owners’ association requested.

Books and records kept by or on behalf of a unit owners’ association may be withheld from examination or copying by unit owners and contract purchasers to the extent that they are drafts not yet incorporated into the books and records of the unit owners’ association or if such books and records concern:

Personnel matters relating to specific, identified persons or a person’s medical records;

Contracts, leases, and other commercial transactions to purchase or provide goods or services, currently in or under negotiation;

Pending or probable litigation. For purposes of this subdivision, “probable litigation” means those instances where there has been a specific threat of litigation from a person or the legal counsel of such person;

Matters involving state or local administrative or other formal proceedings before a government tribunal for enforcement of the condominium instruments or rules and regulations promulgated by the executive board;

Communications with legal counsel that relate to subdivisions 1 through 4 or that are protected by the attorney-client privilege or the attorney work product doctrine;

Disclosure of information in violation of law;

Meeting minutes or other confidential records of an executive session of the executive board held pursuant to subsection C of §

55.1-1949

;

Documentation, correspondence or management or executive board reports compiled for or on behalf of the unit owners’ association or the executive board by its agents or committees for consideration by the executive board in executive session; or

Individual unit owner or member files, other than those of the requesting unit owner, including any individual unit owner’s files kept by or on behalf of the unit owners’ association.

Books and records kept by or on behalf of a unit owners’ association shall be withheld from examination and copying in their entirety only to the extent that an exclusion from disclosure under subsection C applies to the entire content of such books and records. Otherwise, only those portions of the books and records containing information subject to an exclusion under subsection C may be withheld or redacted, and all portions of the books and records that are not so excluded shall be available for examination and copying, provided that the requesting member shall be responsible to the association for paying or reimbursing the association for any reasonable costs incurred by the association in responding to the request for the books and records and review for redaction of the same.

Prior to providing copies of any books and records, the unit owners’ association may impose and collect a charge, not to exceed the reasonable costs of materials and labor, incurred to provide such copies. Charges may be imposed only in accordance with a cost schedule adopted by the executive board in accordance with this subsection. The cost schedule shall (i) specify the charges for materials and labor, (ii) apply equally to all unit owners in good standing, and (iii) be provided to such requesting unit owner at the time the request is made.

History.

1980, c. 738, § 55-79.74:1; 1985, c. 75; 1989, c. 57; 1990, c. 662; 1992, c. 72; 1994, c. 463; 1999, c. 594; 2000, cc. 906, 919; 2001, c. 419; 2011, cc. 334, 361, 605; 2014, c. 207; 2018, c. 663; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 592.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 592 deleted “having standing to bring legal action” preceding “or the legal counsel” in subdivision C 3.

§ 55.1-1946.
Management office.

Unless the condominium instruments expressly provide otherwise, the unit owners’ association shall not be prohibited from maintaining a management office on common elements or in one or more units in the condominium.

History.

1982, c. 545, § 55-79.74:2; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1947.
Transfer of special declarant rights.

For the purposes of this section, “affiliate of a declarant” means any person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a declarant. A person controls a declarant if the person (i) is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the declarant; (ii) directly or indirectly, or acting in concert with one or more persons or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing more than 20 percent of the voting interests in the declarant; (iii) controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the declarant; or (iv) has contributed more than 20 percent of the capital of the declarant. A person is controlled by a declarant if the declarant (a) is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the person; (b) directly or indirectly, or acting in concert with one or more other persons or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing more than 20 percent of the voting interest in the person; (c) controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the person; or (d) has contributed more than 20 percent of the capital of the person. Control does not exist if the powers described in this subsection are held solely as security for an obligation and are not exercised.

No special declarant right may be transferred except by a document evidencing the transfer recorded in every county and city in which any portion of the condominium is located. The instrument shall not be effective unless executed by the transferee.

Upon transfer of any special declarant right, the liability of a transferor declarant shall be as follows:

The transferor shall not be relieved of any obligation or liability arising before the transfer and shall remain liable for warranty obligations imposed upon him by subsection B of §

55.1-1955

. Lack of privity shall not deprive any unit owner of standing to bring an action to enforce any obligation of the transferor.

If the successor to any special declarant right is an affiliate of a declarant, the transferor shall also be jointly and severally liable with the successor for any obligation or liability of the successor that relates to the condominium.

If a transferor retains any special declarant rights, but transfers other special declarant rights to a successor who is not an affiliate of the declarant, the transferor shall also be liable for all obligations and liabilities relating to the retained special declarant rights and imposed on a declarant by this chapter or by the condominium instruments.

A transferor shall have no liability for any breach of a contractual or warranty obligation or for any other act or omission, arising from the exercise of a special declarant right by a successor declarant who is not an affiliate of the transferor.

Except as otherwise provided by the mortgage or deed of trust, in case of foreclosure of a mortgage, sale by a trustee under a deed of trust, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under receivership proceedings or the Bankruptcy Code as codified in Title 11 of the United States Code of any unit owned by a declarant or land subject to development rights:

A person acquiring title to all the land being foreclosed or sold shall, but only upon his request, succeed to all special declarant rights related to that land reserved by that declarant, or only to any rights reserved in the declaration pursuant to §

55.1-1929

and held by that declarant to maintain sales offices, management offices, model units, or signs.

The judgment or instrument conveying title shall provide for transfer of only the special declarant rights requested.For the purposes of this subsection, “development rights” means any right or combination of rights to expand an expandable condominium, contract a contractable condominium, convert convertible land, or convert convertible space.

Upon foreclosure, sale by a trustee under a deed of trust, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under receivership proceedings or the Bankruptcy Code as codified in Title 11 of the United States Code of all units and other land in the condominium owned by a declarant, (i) that declarant ceases to have any special declarant rights and (ii) any period of declarant control reserved under subsection A of §

55.1-1943

shall terminate, unless the judgment or instrument conveying title provides for transfer of all special declarant rights held by that declarant to a successor declarant.

The liabilities and obligations of any person who succeed to any special declarant right shall be as follows:

A successor to any special declarant right who is an affiliate of a declarant is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed on the transferor by this chapter or by the condominium instruments.

A successor to any special declarant right, other than a successor described in subdivisions 3 and 4, who is not an affiliate of a declarant shall be subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed by this chapter or the condominium instruments on a declarant that relate to his exercise or nonexercise of special declarant rights, or on his transferor, except for (i) misrepresentations by any prior declarant, (ii) warranty obligations as provided in subsection B of §

55.1-1955

on improvements made by any previous declarant or made before the condominium was created, (iii) breach of any fiduciary obligation by any previous declarant or his appointees to the executive board, or (iv) any liability or obligation imposed on the transferor as a result of the transferor’s acts or omissions after the transfer.

Unless he is an affiliate of a declarant, a successor to only a right reserved in the declaration to maintain sales offices, management offices, model units, or signs shall not exercise any other special declarant right and shall not be subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant, except the liabilities and obligations arising under Article 4 (§

55.1-1970

et seq.) as to disposition by that successor.

A successor to all special declarant rights held by his transferor who is not an affiliate of that transferor and who succeeded to those rights pursuant to a deed in lieu of foreclosure or a judgment or instrument conveying title to units under subsection D may declare his intention in a recorded instrument to hold those rights solely for transfer to another person. Thereafter, until transferring all special declarant rights to any person acquiring title to any unit owned by the successor, or until recording an instrument permitting exercise of all those rights, that successor may not exercise any of those rights other than any right reserved by his transferor pursuant to subsection A of §

55.1-1943

. Any attempted exercise of those rights is void. So long as a successor declarant may not exercise special declarant rights under this subsection, he shall not be subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant other than liability for his acts and omissions relating to the exercise of rights reserved under subsection A of §

55.1-1943

.

Nothing in this section subjects any successor to a special declarant right to any claims against or other obligations of a transferor declarant, other than claims and obligations arising under this chapter or the condominium instruments.

History.

1982, c. 545, § 55-79.74:3; 1991, c. 497; 1996, c. 977; 2006, c. 646; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For note, “Special Declarant Rights and Obligations Following Mortgage Foreclosure on Condominium Developments,” see 25 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 463 (1984).

§ 55.1-1948.
Declarants not succeeding to special declarant rights.

A declarant who does not succeed to any special declarant rights shall be liable only to the extent of his actions for claims and obligations arising under this chapter or the condominium instruments.

History.

1993, c. 667, § 55-79.74:4; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.